Washington statutes.
RCW 19.118.061

Vehicle with nonconformities or out of service—Notification of correction—Resale or transfer of title—Issuance of new title—Disclosure to buyer—Intervening transferor.

(1) A manufacturer is prohibited from reselling any motor vehicle determined or adjudicated as having a serious safety defect unless the serious safety defect has been corrected and the manufacturer warrants upon the first subsequent resale that the defect has been corrected.

(2) Before any sale or transfer of a motor vehicle that has been replaced or repurchased by the manufacturer after a determination, adjudication, or settlement of a claim under this chapter, the manufacturer must:

(a) Notify the attorney general upon receipt of the motor vehicle;

(b) Submit a title application to the department of licensing in this state for title to the motor vehicle in the name of the manufacturer within sixty days; and

(c) Notify the attorney general and the department of licensing if the nonconformity in the motor vehicle is corrected.

(3) Before the first subsequent resale, either at wholesale or retail, or transfer of title of a motor vehicle previously returned after a final determination, adjudication, or settlement under this chapter or under a similar statute of any other state, the manufacturer, its agent, or a motor vehicle dealer, as defined in *RCW 46.70.011(4), who has actual knowledge of said final determination, adjudication, or settlement must:

(a) Obtain from the attorney general and attach to the motor vehicle a resale window display disclosure notice. Only the retail purchaser may remove the resale window display disclosure notice after execution of the resale disclosure form required under this subsection; and

(b) Obtain from the attorney general, execute, and deliver to the buyer before sale or other transfer of title a resale disclosure form setting forth information identifying the nonconformity and a title brand.

(4)(a) When a manufacturer reacquires a vehicle under this chapter, the department of licensing must issue a new title with a title brand indicating the motor vehicle was returned under this chapter and information that the nonconformity has not been corrected.

(b) Upon receipt of the manufacturer's notification under subsection (2) of this section that the nonconformity has been corrected and the manufacturer's application for title in the name of the manufacturer under this section, the department of licensing must issue a new title with a title brand indicating the motor vehicle was returned under this chapter and information that the nonconformity has been corrected. Upon the first subsequent resale, either at wholesale or retail, or transfer of title of a motor vehicle, as provided under this section, the manufacturer shall warrant upon the resale that the nonconformity has been corrected.

(c) When the department of licensing receives a title application that complies with the department's requirements and procedures for a motor vehicle previously titled in another state and that has a title brand or other documentation indicating the motor vehicle was reacquired by a manufacturer under a similar law, the department of licensing must issue a new title with a title brand indicating the motor vehicle was returned under a similar law of another state.

(5) After a manufacturer's receipt of a motor vehicle under this chapter and prior to a motor vehicle's first subsequent retail transfer by resale or lease, any intervening transferor of a motor vehicle subject to the requirements of this section who has received the resale disclosure form and resale window display disclosure notice provided by the attorney general under this section must deliver the resale disclosure form and resale window display disclosure notice with the motor vehicle to the next transferor, purchaser, or lessee to ensure proper and timely notice and disclosure. Any intervening transferor who fails to comply with this subsection must, at the option of the subsequent transferor or first subsequent retail purchaser or lessee: (a) Indemnify any subsequent transferor or first subsequent retail purchaser for all damages caused by such violation; or (b) repurchase the motor vehicle at the full purchase price including all fees, taxes, and costs incurred for goods and services which were included in the subsequent transaction.

[ 2010 c 31 s 1; 2009 c 351 s 4; 1998 c 298 s 5; 1995 c 254 s 4; 1989 c 347 s 3; 1987 c 344 s 5.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 46.70.011 was alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k), changing subsection (4) to subsection (17), effective July 1, 2011.

Application—2009 c 351: See note following RCW 19.118.021.

Severability—1998 c 298: See note following RCW 19.118.021.

Effective date—Severability—1995 c 254: See notes following RCW 19.118.021.